Maryland, session 2026, SB0459.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Finance and Procurement
14–419.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION, “LOCAL MARYLAND NEWS ORGANIZATION”
MEANS AN ENTITY THAT:
(I) ENGAGES PROFESSIONALS TO CREATE, EDIT, PRODUCE,
AND DISTRIBUTE ORIGINAL CONTENT CONCERNING MATTERS OF PUBLIC INTEREST
THROUGH REPORTING, CONDUCTING INTERVIEWS, OBSERVING CURRENT EVENTS,
OR ANALYZING INFORMATION;
(II) HAS AT LEAST ONE FULL–TIME EQUIVALENT EMPLOYEE
WHO:
1. IS EMPLOYED FULL TIME;
2. IS DEDICATED TO PROVIDING COVERAGE OF EVENTS
IN MARYLAND; AND
3. 2. RESIDES IN MARYLAND OR WITHIN 50 MILES OF
MARYLAND;
(III) IN THE CASE OF A PRINT PUBLICATION, HAS PUBLISHED AT
LEAST ONE PRINT PUBLICATION PER MONTH OVER THE PREVIOUS 12 MONTHS AND:
1. HOLDS A VALID U.S. POSTAL SERVICE PERIODICAL
PERMIT; OR
2. HAS AT LEAST 25% OF ITS CONTENT DEDICATED TO
LOCAL MARYLAND NEWS;
(IV) IN THE CASE OF AN ENTITY THAT PUBLISHES CONTENT
ONLY IN DIGITAL FORM:
1. HAS PUBLISHED AT LEAST ONE PIECE ABOUT EVENTS
IN MARYLAND PER WEEK OVER THE PREVIOUS 12 MONTHS; AND

SENATE BILL 459 3
2. FOR WHICH AT LEAST 33% OF ITS AUDIENCE,
AVERAGED OVER A 12–MONTH PERIOD, IS LOCATED IN MARYLAND;
(V) HAS DISCLOSED, IN ITS PRINT PUBLICATION OR ON ITS
WEBSITE:
1. ITS BENEFICIAL OWNERS; OR
2. IN THE CASE OF A NONPROFIT ENTITY, ITS BOARD OF
DIRECTORS; AND
(VI) IN THE CASE OF AN ENTITY THAT MAINTAINS TAX STATUS
UNDER § 501(C)(3) OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE, AND IS NOT AN ENTITY
DESCRIBED IN ITEM (III) OR (IV) OF THIS PARAGRAPH:
1. HAS DECLARED COVERAGE OF LOCAL OR STATE
MARYLAND NEWS AS ITS STATED MISSION IN A FILING WITH THE INTERNAL
REVENUE SERVICE; OR
2. HAS RECEIVED A COMMUNITY SERVICE GRANT FROM
THE CORPORATION FOR PUBLIC BROADCASTING PRIOR TO 2026; AND
(VII) AN ENTITY THAT:
1. IS A BROADCAST STATION AS DEFINED UNDER
SECTION 3 OF THE FEDERAL COMMUNICATIONS ACT OF 1934; AND
2. HAS A COMMUNITY LICENSE IN MARYLAND ASSIGNED
BY THE FEDERAL COMMUNICATIONS COMMISSION.
(2) “LOCAL MARYLAND NEWS ORGANIZATION” DOES NOT INCLUDE
AN ENTITY THAT RECEIVES MORE THAN 50% OF ITS GROSS RECEIPTS FROM:
(I) A POLITICAL ORGANIZATION DESCRIBED IN 26 U.S.C. § 527;
OR
(II) ANY ORGANIZATION THAT MAINTAINS STATUS UNDER 26
U.S.C. § 501(C)(4), (5), OR (6).
(B) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO ANY PROCUREMENT CONTRACT FOR
PRINT OR DIGITAL ADVERTISING TO BE PUBLISHED OR BROADCAST WITH THE
PRIMARY AUDIENCE FOCUS OUTSIDE OF MARYLAND FOR THE PURPOSES OF:

SENATE BILL 459
(1) PROMOTING TOURISM TO THE STATE; OR
(2) EMPLOYEE RECRUITMENT; OR
(3) ECONOMIC INVESTMENT.
(C) (1) A UNIT SHALL STRUCTURE PROCUREMENT PROCEDURES TO
ACHIEVE AN OVERALL GOAL OF 50% OF THE UNIT’S TOTAL DOLLAR VALUE OF
PROCUREMENT CONTRACTS FOR PRINT OR DIGITAL ADVERTISING BEING MADE
DIRECTLY TO LOCAL MARYLAND NEWS ORGANIZATIONS.
(2) A UNIT SHALL PRIORITIZE THE USE OF MARYLAND NEWS
ORGANIZATIONS THAT HAVE A PRIMARY MISSION OF REPORTING ON AND SERVING
UNDERSERVED COMMUNITIES IN MARYLAND.
(D) A UNIT MAY CONSULT WITH A THIRD–PARTY NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION
TO PREPARE AND MAINTAIN A LIST OF ELIGIBLE LOCAL NEWS ORGANIZATIONS
UNDER THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.